Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB503.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Pennsylvania Climate Emissions Reduction Act.Section 2. Findings and purpose.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) The Governor established a working group in April 2023 to evaluate the merits of Pennsylvania's membership in the Regional Greenhouse Gas Initiative and to consider proposed alternatives to that membership.12345678910111213141516171819 (2) The working group was comprised of representatives of organized labor, environmental stakeholders and the energy industry, including fuel production, electric utilities, fossil fuel and nuclear generation and consumer advocates.(3) The working group was charged with ensuring that any recommendation be developed to protect and create energy jobs, take real action to address climate change and ensure reliable, affordable power for Pennsylvania's consumers over the long term.(4) The working group found that:(i) Reducing greenhouse gas emissions in this Commonwealth is necessary.(ii) A cap-and-invest carbon regulation for the power sector that generates revenue to support this Commonwealth's energy transition would be the optimal approach for this Commonwealth.(iii) A cap-and-invest program should include policies and investment strategies which help avoid any potential emissions leakage, higher localized pollution, increased energy costs and job loss.(5) The purpose of this act is to establish this Commonwealth as an energy leader by authorizing a Pennsylvania-run cap-and-invest program.(6) Upon the establishment of a Pennsylvania-run cap-and-invest program, this Commonwealth shall not participate in any other carbon auction addressing emissions from the electric generation sector unless specifically authorized by act of the General Assembly.Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall 20250HB0503PN1480 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Board." The Environmental Quality Board."Commission." The Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission."Department." The Department of Environmental Protection of the Commonwealth."Environmental justice area." A geographic area characterized by increased pollution burden, and sensitive or vulnerable populations based on demographic and environmental data as identified by the department."PACER." The Pennsylvania Climate Emissions Reduction Program established under this act."Regulatory Review Act." The act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.Section 4. Pennsylvania Climate Emissions Reduction Program.(a) Establishment.--The Pennsylvania Climate Emissions Reduction Program is established within the department for the purpose of implementing a Pennsylvania-run CO2 Budget Trading Program.(b) Pennsylvania-run auction.--Notwithstanding 25 Pa. Code § 145.401(a) (relating to auction of CO2 allowances), the department shall conduct a Pennsylvania-run auction in accordance with 25 Pa. Code § 145.401(b).(c) Implementation and administrative support.--The department may delegate implementation and administrative support functions for any CO2 allowance auction conducted under 25 Pa. Code §§ 145.401 through 145.409 (relating to approval of auction results) to an agent qualified to conduct auctions provided that the agent performs all functions under the direction and oversight of the department.20250HB0503PN1480 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Compliance.--Notwithstanding subsection (c), the department shall:(1) Retain its authority to enforce compliance with 25 Pa. Code Ch. 145 Subch. E (relating to CO2 Budget Trading Program) except as otherwise provided in this act.(2) Retain control over the proceeds associated with the sale of Pennsylvania CO2 allowances.(3) Deposit the proceeds in accordance with section 7.(e) Other states.--(1) Allowances issued by the Pennsylvania-run auction conducted in accordance with subsection (b) may be offered for compliance purposes in another state if permitted by the laws of that state.(2) Allowances issued by another cap-and-invest program shall be accepted by the department for compliance with PACER if the department determines that the CO2 emissions represented by an allowance issued by another program are approximately equal to or greater than the CO2 emissions represented by an allowance issued by PACER.(f) Auction participation and monitoring.--(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, only the following categories of parties shall be eligible to participate in Pennsylvania-run auctions conducted under this act:(i) The owner or operator of an electricity generator with a nameplate capacity equal to or greater than 25 megawatts electrical.(ii) A broker.(iii) A financial or investment institution.(iv) A market participant as specified in the notice 20250HB0503PN1480 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of a Pennsylvania-run auction.(2) A nonprofit entity shall be ineligible to participate in Pennsylvania-run auctions.(3) The department shall select an independent market monitor, such as a certified public accounting firm or similar entity, to observe the conduct and outcome of each auction and the independent market monitor shall issue a report to the department in accordance with professional auditing standards addressing whether the auction was conducted in accordance with all statutory and regulatory requirements and whether there was any indication of collusive behavior among auction participants or attempts at market manipulation that impacted the results of the auction.(4) The department may prohibit an otherwise qualified party from participating in a Pennsylvania-run auction under this act if the department determines that conduct by the party could compromise the integrity of the Pennsylvania-run auction.Section 5. PACER emissions budget.(a) Review.--(1) Within 120 days of the effective date of this paragraph, the department shall review the Pennsylvania CO2 Budget Trading Program base budget established in 25 Pa. Code § 145.341 (relating to Pennsylvania CO2 Budget Trading Program base budget) and consider the impact of the base budget on jobs, consumers and the environment to determine whether revisions to the base budget are needed.(2) In evaluating the impact of the base budget on jobs, the department shall consider available studies regarding the impact of a PACER emission budget on energy-related 20250HB0503PN1480 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 employment and shall consult with representatives of organized labor.(3) In evaluating the impact of the base budget on consumers, the department shall consider available economic modeling regarding the impact of a PACER emission budget on costs, if any, passed on to consumers, and shall consult with the Consumer Advocate of the Commonwealth and advocates for low-income Pennsylvanians and representatives of large energy users.(4) In evaluating the impact of the base budget on the environment, the department shall consider available studies and modeling regarding the impact of a PACER emission budget on emissions and compliance with existing and proposed Federal regulations of new and existing power plants, as well as the impacts on vulnerable communities, and shall consult with representatives of environmental nonprofit organizations, environmental justice advocates, academic institutions and the electric industry.(b) Revisions.--If the department determines that revisions to the base budget are needed, the department shall recommend a revised PACER emissions budget to the board.(c) Final omitted regulation.--The board may promulgate a final-omitted regulation under the Regulatory Review Act to amend 25 Pa. Code § 145.341 and adopt a PACER emissions budget as recommended by the department under this section.(d) Set-aside allocations.--The department shall retain allowance set-aside allocations, including the waste coal allowance set-aside and the combined heat and power allowance set-aside, in no less than the amounts specified in 25 Pa. Code § 145.342 (relating to CO2 allowance allocations).20250HB0503PN1480 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 6. Prohibition.After the effective date of the regulation adopting a PACER emissions budget in accordance with section 5, the department is prohibited from joining or participating in a CO2 allowance auction addressing emissions from the electric generation sector other than the Pennsylvania-run program established by this act, unless an act of the General Assembly enacted after the effective date of this section specifically authorizes such joinder or participation.Section 7. Deposit of auction proceeds from PACER.(a) Proceeds and expenditures.--The auction proceeds authorized and collected under section 4 shall be deposited into the State Treasury as follows and may not be expended except as provided in this section:(1) Seventy percent of the auction proceeds shall be deposited into the Consumer Protection Account established under subsection (b).(2) Ten percent of the auction proceeds shall be deposited into the Pennsylvania Energy Transformation Account established under subsection (c).(3) Ten percent of the auction proceeds shall be deposited into the Workforce Enhancement Fund established under subsection (d).(4) The balance of the auction proceeds shall be deposited into the Low-Income Support Account established under subsection (e).(b) Consumer Protection Account.--(1) The Consumer Protection Account is established in the General Fund. The money in the Consumer Protection Account is appropriated on a continuing basis to the 20250HB0503PN1480 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 commission for the purpose of paying rebates to electric ratepayers calculated on a per-kilowatt-hour basis.(2) The commission shall promulgate a final-omitted regulation under the Regulatory Review Act to establish a system under which money from the Consumer Protection Account is payable to electric ratepayers, including customers of electric cooperative corporations, as direct credits on their electric bills.(3) The commission shall require that entities receiving payment from the Consumer Protection Account on behalf of ratepayers provide the amount of the direct credit on a line on each customer's bill with the title "PACER Bill Credit."(c) Pennsylvania Energy Transformation Account.--(1) The Pennsylvania Energy Transformation Account is established in the General Fund. The money in the Pennsylvania Energy Transformation Account is appropriated on a continuing basis to the department for administering PACER and for grant programs to support projects that eliminate air pollution and for other purposes authorized under this subsection. No less than 40% of money in the account shall be allocated to projects located in environmental justice areas.(2) Eligible projects for the grant program shall include:(i) Cost-effective carbon capture utilization and storage.(ii) Abandoned oil and gas well plugging.(iii) Mass transit and electric vehicle transportation.(iv) Agricultural conservation.(v) Forest stewardship.20250HB0503PN1480 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (vi) Process electrification.(vii) Fuel switching.(viii) Combined heat and power.(ix) Demand response and reduction.(x) Energy efficiency, including HVAC and building envelope improvements.(xi) Cost-effective carbon capture utilization and storage.(xii) Clean and renewable energy investments, including biomass, geothermal, hydropower, energy storage and solar and wind technologies.(xiii) Projects that contribute to the reduction or elimination of greenhouse gas pollution.(3) The department may enter into a memorandum of understanding with the Department of Community and Economic Development to allocate money available under this subsection to the State Weatherization Assistance Program.(4) Up to 5% of the unencumbered and uncommitted balance of the account may be used for the department's costs to administer PACER. The department shall submit to the Governor each fiscal year, for approval or disapproval, estimates of the amount of money to be expended from the account for administration of PACER as part of the department's annual budget request in accordance with Article VI of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(5) The State Treasurer may not issue a warrant for payment from the account for the purpose described in paragraph (4) in excess of the amount approved by the Governor under paragraph (4).20250HB0503PN1480 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (6) The department shall submit an annual report to the General Assembly related to the projects under this subsection, including information on the projects located in environmental justice areas and the percentage of the account used for the projects.(d) Workforce Enhancement Fund.--(1) The Workforce Enhancement Fund is established as a nonlapsing fund in the State Treasury for energy projects. All interest earned from the investment or deposit of money accumulated in the Workforce Enhancement Fund shall be deposited into the fund for the same use. All money deposited into the Workforce Enhancement Fund shall be held in trust, shall not be considered general revenue of the Commonwealth, shall be used only to effectuate the purposes of this subsection, as determined by the Workforce Enhancement Fund Board, and shall be subject to audit by the Auditor General. The money in the fund is appropriated on a continuing basis to the department.(2) A grantee awarded money under this subsection must pay at least the prevailing wage rate for workers on the project.(3) No less than 40% of money in the fund shall be allocated to projects located in environmental justice areas.(4) The money in the fund may be used for grant programs to support energy investments, including the following:(i) Projects to identify new uses for legacy coal and natural gas sites such as small modular reactor development and construction, geothermal, battery storage, natural gas with carbon capture and manufacturing.20250HB0503PN1480 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) Projects to advance carbon capture utilization and storage technology, including development and deployment at existing facilities and sites.(iii) Clean hydrogen production, consumption and electric generation project development.(iv) Solar projects, particularly rooftop solar, on schools and warehouses and community solar.(v) Methane well capping and capture projects.(vi) Establishment of training programs to ensure workers are local and plugging is done to fully mitigate emissions.(vii) Projects to improve compliance with Federal and State environmental requirements at existing generating units, including control technology to reduce air emissions.(5) The Workforce Enhancement Fund Board is established and shall administer the fund for the purposes specified under this subsection.(6) The Workforce Enhancement Fund Board shall consist of the following members:(i) The Governor or a designee who must be designated in writing prior to serving as designee.(ii) The Secretary of Community and Economic Development or a designee who must be an employee of the Department of Community and Economic Development and designated in writing prior to serving as designee.(iii) The Secretary of Environmental Protection or a designee who must be an employee of the department and designated in writing prior to serving as designee.(iv) The Secretary of Labor and Industry or a 20250HB0503PN1480 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 designee who must be an employee of the Department of Labor and Industry and designated in writing prior to serving as designee.(v) Five members appointed by the Governor as follows:(A) Four of which members must be chosen from a list of candidates recommended by the president of the Pennsylvania Building and Construction Trades Council and one of whom shall be designated as chair.(B) One of which member must be the executive director or a member of the State Workforce Development Board.(vi) One member appointed by the President pro tempore of the Senate.(vii) One member appointed by the Minority Leader of the Senate.(viii) One member appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.(ix) One member appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives.(7) Initially, from the appointees under paragraph (6)(v), three members shall be appointed for terms of two years and two members shall be appointed for terms of four years. The terms of the members' successors shall be four years each, except that any person appointed to fill a vacancy shall serve only for the unexpired term. A member's term shall extend until the member's successor is appointed and qualified. An appointed member of the board shall be eligible for reappointment.(8) The board shall hold its first meeting within 90 20250HB0503PN1480 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 days of the effective date of this paragraph.(9) The members of the board may not be compensated for service as members but shall be entitled to reimbursement for all necessary expenses incurred in connection with the performance of their duties as members. Reimbursements shall be allocated from money available from the fund established under this subsection.(10) The board shall provide for the holding of regular and special meetings at least biannually at the call of the chair. Seven members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of any business and a majority of the members present shall be required to adopt any action.(11) The board has the power and duty, including:(i) Adopt bylaws, if necessary.(ii) Make, execute and deliver contracts and grant agreements.(iii) Develop, within one year of the board's establishment and biennially thereafter, a State plan for the availability and distribution of money from the fund established under this section. The board shall make the State plan available on its publicly accessible Internet website.(iv) Administer and award grants from the fund to eligible energy community projects and monitor the expenditure of money in the fund.(v) Perform other operational activities necessary or appropriate to further the purpose of this section.(vi) Submit an annual report to the General Assembly detailing grant programs, activities and outcomes. The annual report shall include information on the projects 20250HB0503PN1480 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 located in environmental justice areas, including the percentage of the fund used for such projects.(12) Administrative support for the board shall be provided by the Department of Labor and Industry.(13) The following acts shall apply to the board:(i) The act of July 19, 1957 (P.L.1017, No.451), known as the State Adverse Interest Act.(ii) The act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.(iii) The provisions of 65 Pa.C.S. Chs. 7 (relating to open meetings) and 11 (relating to ethics standards and financial disclosure).(e) Low-Income Support Account.--The Low-Income Support Account is established in the General Fund. Money deposited into the Low-Income Support Account shall be used, in accordance with law, to supplement Low-Income Home Energy Assistance Program grants or other grants that provide cooling assistance for eligible customers who seek financial resources to cover cooling expenses.Section 8. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0503PN1480 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021